Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB897.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2803 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2803. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Long-term resource adequacy agreement." An agreement between an electric distribution company and another person or corporation in which the electric distribution company invests in a new generation resource in exchange for a portion of the net revenues derived from the new generation resource, with such portion of the net revenues being credited to customers through 12345678910111213141516171819 a nonbypassable surcharge mechanism established under section 2807(e)(5.1)(i)(F) (relating to duties of electric distribution companies)."New generation resource." An electric generation facility that provides electric generation supply to the bulk electric system and that is newly constructed in the electric distribution company's transmission control zone or service territory, including one or more of the following resources:(1) Natural gas.(2) Nuclear.(3) Battery storage.(4) Alternative energy sources, as defined under section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.* * *"Resource adequacy." When the projection for all available sources of electric supply, as described by section 524(a)(2) (relating to data to be supplied by electric utilities), exceeds the projection of electrical energy use and electrical demand by a reasonable reserve margin."Resource inadequacy." When the projection of available sources of electric supply, including capacity and generation availability during times of demand, as calculated for resource adequacy, falls below a reasonable reserve margin.* * *Section 2. Section 2807(e)(3.2), (3.3), (3.4) and (3.7) of Title 66 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *20250SB0897PN1027 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Obligation to serve.--A default service provider's obligation to provide electric generation supply service following the expiration of a generation rate cap specified under section 2804(4) (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry) or a restructuring plan under section 2806(f) is revised as follows:* * *(3.2) The electric power procured pursuant to paragraph (3.1) shall include [a prudent mix] one or more of the following:(i) Spot market purchases.(ii) Short-term contracts.(iii) Long-term purchase contracts, entered into as a result of an auction, request for proposal or bilateral contract that is free of undue influence, duress or favoritism, of more than four and not more than [20] 30 years. The default service provider shall have sole discretion to determine the source and fuel type. Long-term purchase contracts under this subparagraph may [not constitute more than 25%] be used to procure up to the full amount of the default service provider's projected default service load [unless the commission, after a hearing, determines for good cause that a greater portion of load is necessary to achieve least cost procurement]. This subparagraph shall not apply to contracts executed under paragraph (5).[(3.3) The commission may determine that a contract is required to be extended for a longer term of up to 20 years, if the extension is necessary to ensure adequate and reliable service at least cost to customers over time.]20250SB0897PN1027 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3.4) The [prudent mix of] contracts entered into pursuant to [paragraphs] paragraph (3.2) [and (3.3)] shall be designed to ensure:(i) Adequate and reliable service at a reasonable cost to customers.[(ii) The least cost to customers over time.](iii) Compliance with the requirements of paragraph (3.1).* * *(3.7) At the time the commission evaluates the plan and prior to approval, in determining if the default electric service provider's plan obtains generation supply at the least or some indicator of lowest reasonable cost, the commission shall consider the default service provider's obligation to provide adequate and reliable service to customers and that the default service provider has obtained [a prudent mix of contracts to obtain least cost on a long-term, short-term and spot market basis and] contracts to obtain reasonable cost generation supply. The commission shall make specific findings which shall include the following:(i) The default service provider's plan includes prudent steps necessary to negotiate favorable generation supply contracts.(ii) The default service provider's plan includes prudent steps necessary to obtain [least] reasonable cost generation [supply contracts on a long-term, short-term and spot market basis].(iii) Neither the default service provider nor its affiliated interest has withheld from the market any 20250SB0897PN1027 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 generation supply in a manner that violates Federal law.* * *(5.1) Ensuring Pennsylvania energy adequacy and security, including:(i) Electric distribution company investment in new generation resources in accordance with the following:(A) Electric distribution companies may petition the commission to demonstrate that a resource inadequacy exists. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a resource inadequacy exists upon a showing that the reserve margin forecast, or similar replacement reserve margin forecast, falls below the target reserve margin in any of the planning years of the applicable independent system operator or regional transmission organization in the 10-year forward installed reserve margin forecast. If the commission, upon the petition of an electric distribution company, finds that a resource inadequacy exists the electric distribution company may invest in new generation resources, up to and including:(I) the electric distribution company's 100% direct ownership of new generation resources;(II) the electric distribution company entering into long-term resource adequacy agreements to invest in new generation resources that does not involve 100% direct ownership by the electric distribution company; or(III) both subclauses (I) and (II).(B) The commission shall render a decision on an 20250SB0897PN1027 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric distribution company's petition within nine months of the date of filing and if no decision is rendered within that time frame, the petition shall be deemed approved.(C) The petition to the commission shall include the results of at least one request for proposals for new generation resources from the third-party generation developers. The request for proposals shall, at a minimum, evaluate new generation resource proposals based on the following factors:(I) Impact on addressing resource inadequacy.(II) Certainty of permitting and timely construction for new generation resources.(III) Ability to mitigate risk to customers, including price volatility.(D) The commission shall determine which proposal, including the electric distribution company's proposal, is reasonable and prudent and issue an order approving either the electric distribution company's proposal or a proposal submitted in response to the electric distribution company's request for proposals. An electric distribution company shall be permitted to recover the cost of preparing, filing and litigating the proposal, including the cost of conducting the requests for proposals in accordance with clause (F).(E) If the commission approves a proposal that does not involve the electric distribution company's direct ownership of new generation resources, the 20250SB0897PN1027 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission shall order the electric distribution company to enter into a long-term resource adequacy agreement for the approved new generation resource. The electric distribution company shall recover costs from entering into the long-term resource adequacy agreement in accordance with clause (F). In addition to the cost recovery allowed under clause (F), the commission shall allow an additional financial incentive at a reasonable rate set by the commission. In the absence of a stated return on equity established in a distribution rate case, the commission shall use the return on equity for capital recovered under the distribution system improvement charge, pursuant to section 1353 (relating to distribution system improvement charge), in effect at the time of the commission's order.(F) Costs for new generation resources and long-term resource adequacy agreements, including all costs of preparing, filing and litigating the petition under this subsection, shall be recovered from customers in all customer classes through a nonbypassable cost-recovery tariff mechanism, in accordance with section 1307, to ensure full and timely recovery of all prudent and reasonable costs of investment by the electric distribution company in new generation resources, as approved by the commission, including administrative costs, operation and maintenance expenses and a just and reasonable pretax return on the electric distribution company's capital investments in the new generation resources. 20250SB0897PN1027 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An electric distribution company or the owner of the new generation resources under a long-term resource adequacy agreement shall credit to customers through a reconciliation of the nonbypassable cost-recovery tariff mechanism a portion of the net revenues received from offering resources associated with the new generation resources into wholesale markets.(G) The pretax return for the electric distribution company's capital investments in the new generation resources shall be calculated using the Federal and State income tax rates, the utility's actual capital structure and actual cost rates for long-term debt and preferred stock as of the last day of the three-month period ending one month prior to the effective date of the surcharge mechanism established under clause (F). The cost of equity shall be the equity return rate approved in the utility's most recent fully litigated base rate proceeding for which a final order was entered not more than two years prior to the effective date of the surcharge mechanism. If more than two years have elapsed between the entry of a final order and the effective date of the surcharge mechanism, the equity return rate used in the calculation shall be the equity return rate calculated by the commission in the most recent Quarterly Report on the Earnings of Jurisdictional Utilities released by the commission.(ii) This paragraph shall supersede any conflicting provisions of this title or other laws of this Commonwealth and shall specifically supersede all 20250SB0897PN1027 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this chapter.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0897PN1027 - 9 - 123